Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.070

Convenience contracts.

A convenience contract is a contract for specific goods or services, or both, that is solicited and established in accordance with procurement laws and rules for use by a specified group of agencies. A convenience contract is not available for general use and must be approved by the department. Convenience contracts are not intended to replace or supersede master contracts as defined in this chapter.

[ 2024 c 140 s 2; 2015 c 79 s 6; 2012 c 224 s 8.]